Washington statutes.
RCW 15.37.060

Penalty for delinquency on renewal of license.

If an application for renewal of a license provided for in RCW 15.37.030 is not filed prior to July 1st of any one year, a penalty of ten dollars shall be assessed and added to the original fee and shall be paid by the applicant before the renewal license shall be issued: PROVIDED, That such penalty shall not apply if the applicant furnishes an affidavit that he or she has not sold, offered for sale, held for sale, or advertised for sale, milk, cream, or skim milk for animal food consumption subsequent to the expiration of his or her prior license.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6054; 1961 c 285 s 6.]